Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1388HV (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 795 Section 1. Section 453C.1, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. âUnits soldâ means the number of individual cigarettes 3 sold in the state by the applicable tobacco product 4 manufacturer, whether directly or through a distributor, 5 retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, during the 6 year in question, as measured by excise taxes collected by the 7 state on in packs bearing required to bear the excise stamp of 8 the state or on in the case of roll-your-own tobacco containers 9 on which a tax is due pursuant to chapter 453A . The department 10 of revenue shall adopt rules as are necessary to ascertain 11 the amount of state excise tax paid on the cigarettes of such 12 tobacco product manufacturer for each year. 13 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 14 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 15